Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-435
Entry permits; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 37-434 to 37-446, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Motor vehicle means any self-propelled vehicle of a type required to be registered and licensed for operation on the highways of the state;

(2) Permit areas means those areas, or portions of areas, of the Nebraska state park system which are defined in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of section 37-338 and which are designated as provided in sections 37-339 and 37-340; and

(3) Permit means motor vehicle entry permit.

Laws 1977, LB 81, § 2;

Laws 1980, LB 723, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1102;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 145;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 33.

The term "permit area," as used in the statute, is not unconstitutionally vague. State v. Sprague, 213 Neb. 581, 330 N.W.2d 739 (1983).